src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON OADDÁT_IV !!= @CODE@   Incoative, (doarrut,jåhttåt). Only Sg3 passive. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation.
      +IV:%>      OADDÁTStem          ;
      +IV:        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
      +IV:d       SG3PASS             ; !
 +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives oaddáluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström



!!€gt-norm: bæhkkát # Contracted test
!!€ bæhkkáv:           bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ bähkkáv:           bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ bæhkkájiv:          bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ bähkkájiv:          bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ bæhkkájma:         bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ bähkkájma:         bæhkkát+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON DULLUT_IV !!= @CODE@  Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only Sg3 passiv.
      +IV:%>      DULLUTStem          ;
      +IV:        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
      +IV:d       SG3PASS             ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ;



!!€gt-norm: dussut # Contracted test
!!€ dussuv:           dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ dussujiv:          dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ dussujma:         dussut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON TJUOLLÁT_TV  !!= @CODE@  Inceptiv. All passive. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation,  (gullát, bårråt)
            +TV:%>         TJUOLLÁTStem        ;
            +TV:           DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
          ! +TV:           CONTR-PASSIVE       ; ! Outcommented because of incoativity, but why? 
+IV+Cond:%>»lulu    V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: gajkkát # Contracted test
!!€ gajkkáv:           gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ gajkkájiv:          gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ gajkkájma:         gajkkát+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1


LEXICON STRÁFFUT_TV  !!= @CODE@  Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. All duvvat passives. 
            +TV:%>        STRÁFFUTStem        ;
            +TV:          DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
            +TV:          CONTR-PASSIVE       ;
+IV+Cond:%>»lulu   V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: gáhpput # Contracted test
!!€ gáhppuv:           gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ gáhppujiv:          gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ gáhppujma:         gáhpput+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON TSIEGGIT_TV !!= @CODE@  Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All duvvat passives. 
                                                                                      +TV:%>      STRÁFFUTStem        ;
                                                                                      +TV:        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:»Z1r    N-ODDCASE           ; !
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:»Z1r    OTH-ODDCASE         ; !
                                                                                      +TV:        CONTR-PASSIVE       ;
                                                                                 +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: gámmpit # Contracted test
!!€ gámmpiv:           gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ gámmpijiv:         gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ gámmpijma:         gámmpit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ gámmpár:           gámmpit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON VALLIT_TV !!= @CODE@ Makes nouns via -ár derivation. Gets only passive Sg3
              +TV:%>      DULLUTStem          ;
              +TV:        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r    N-ODDCASE           ; ! -ár derivation
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r    OTH-ODDCASE         ; ! -ár derivation
              +TV:d       SG3PASS             ;
         +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: hinnit # Contracted test
!!€ hinniv:            hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ hinnijiv:          hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ hinnijma:          hinnit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ hinnár:             hinnit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom



!!
!!
!! contraced verbs assimilated and outside the main pattern.
! ----------------
!!
!!

LEXICON PLÁNIT_TV !!= @CODE@ Transitive Two-syll contraced words not in third grade as contraced verb have been. Two syllable transitive NEW loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All passives.
              +TV:%>        DULLUTStem          ;
              +TV:          DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r      N-ODDCASE           ; ! -ár derivation only nom
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r      OTH-ODDCASE         ; ! -ár derivation other cases
              +TV:          CONTR-PASSIVE       ;
  +IV+Cond:%>»lulu   V-ODD-PRET          ;

!!€gt-norm: hinnit # Contracted test
!!€ bloaggiv:            bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ blåggiv:            bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ bloaggijiv:          bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ blåggijiv:          bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ bloaggijma:          bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ blåggijma:          bloaggit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ bloaggár:            bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ blåggår:            bloaggit+V+TV+Der/r+N+Sg+Nom



LEXICON SLEDUT_IV !!= @CODE@ Intransitive Two-syll contraced words not in third grade as contraced verb have been. Only Sg3 passiv.
              +IV:%>      DULLUTStem          ;
              +IV:        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r    N-ODDCASE           ; ! -ár derivation only nom
 +TV+Der1+Der/r+N:»Z1r    OTH-ODDCASE         ; ! -ár derivation other cases
              +IV:d       SG3PASS             ;
         +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ;


!!€gt-norm: håŋŋlit # Contracted test
!!€ håŋŋliv:           håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ håŋŋlijiv:         håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ håŋŋlijma:         håŋŋlit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1



LEXICON BADASS_TV !!= @CODE@ NEW badly assimilated two syllable transitive loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. All passives. Err/orth taged in stem file

+OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm: PLÁNIT_TV ;


LEXICON BADASS_IV !!= @CODE@  NEW badly assimilated two syllable intransitive loan verbs. Makes nouns via -ár derivation. Only Sg3 passiv. Err/orth taged in stem file.

+OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm: SLEDUT_IV ;



LEXICON ABBONERE_TV !!= @CODE@  Transitive loan words with more than two syllables with -erit/ierit endings. Duvvat passives. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only the two last syllables are assimilated to sami. LONG -e is assimilated in different ways in Norway and Sweden: In Norway, it becomes -ie, and in Sweden -e.
+OLang/NOB+TV: ABBONERE_TV_INFL ;



LEXICON BRILJERE_IV !!= @CODE@  Intransitive loan words with more than two syllables with -erit/ierit endings. Does not make nouns via -ár derivation. Only the two last syllables are assimilated to sami. Long -e is assimilated in different ways in dialects in Norway and Sweden: In Norway it often becomes -ie, while in Sweden itºs usually -e.  
+OLang/NOB+IV: BRILJERE_IV_INFL ;



LEXICON BRILJERE_IV_INFL !!= @CODE@  
      +Area/NO:ieri%>      DULLUTStem          ;
      +Area/NO:ieri        DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
      +Area/NO:ierid       SG3PASS             ;
 +Area/NO+Cond:%>»ierilulu V-ODD-PRET          ;
      +Area/SE:eri%>       DULLUTStem          ;
      +Area/SE:eri         DeverbalVerbsOADDÁT ;
      +Area/SE:erid        SG3PASS             ;
 +Area/SE+Cond:%>»erilulu  V-ODD-PRET          ;





!!€gt-norm: briljierit # Contracted test
!!€ briljieriv:         briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ briljeriv:          briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ briljierijiv:       briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ briljerijiv:        briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ briljierijma:       briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ briljerijma:        briljierit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
