src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
abdisierit+V+Area/SE:abdik BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN
agierit+V:ag BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN
aksjonierit+V+Area/NO:aksjon BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN 
aksjonierit+V+Err/Orth:aksjun BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN
appellierit+V:appell BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN
avansierit+V:avans ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
bassát+V:basºsá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
briljierit+V:brilj BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN
buojkkát+V:buojkká TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
buollát+V:buolºlá OADDÁT_IV ;
bádit+V:bádi PLÁNIT_TV ;
bálkkit+V:bálkki TSIEGGIT_TV ;
bálldit+V:bálldi DULLUT_IV ;
bállit+V:bálºli VALLIT_TV ;
bállát+V:bálºlá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
bårråt+Hom2+V:bårºrå TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
desijnnit+V+Err/Orth:designi BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN 
desorganisierit+V:des^organis ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
detaljstivrrit+V+Err/Orth:detalj#stivri PLÁNIT_TV ; ! LOAN-CMP
dievnnut+V:dievnnu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
diŋŋgut+V:diŋŋgu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
doarrut+V:doarºru OADDÁT_IV ;
dubbit+V+OLang/NOB:dubbi BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN starng because of norwegian u
dullut+V:dulºlu DULLUT_IV ;
duolldát+V:duolldá OADDÁT_IV ;
duolmmit+V:duolmmi TSIEGGIT_TV ;
dyrkkit+V+Err/Lex:dyrkki BADASS_TV ; ! Dyrka
dåbddåt+Hom2+V:dåbddå TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
eksistierit+V+Area/SE:exist BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN 
eksperimentierit+V+Area/SE:ex^periment BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN 
eksplodierit+V+Area/SE:ex^plod BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN 
ekspropriierit+V+Area/SE:ex^propri^ ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN 
fernissit+V+Area/SE:fernissi PLÁNIT_TV ; ! LOAN fernisere?
fieksit+V:fieksi VALLIT_TV ;
fisskut+V:fissku STRÁFFUT_TV ;
flirtit+V+Err/Lex:flirti BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN BADASS
frondierit+V:frond ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
fráŋkit+V+Err/Lex:fráŋki BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN  hæ? not 3 grade,
fájllut+V:fájllu DULLUT_IV ;
gierggit+V:gierggi TSIEGGIT_TV ;
goallut+V:goalºlu OADDÁT_IV ;
goarrát+V:goarºrá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
guoddut+V:guoddu DULLUT_IV ;
gáhpit+V:gáhpi PLÁNIT_TV ;
gállát+V:gálºlá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
gåjkkit+V:gåjkki TSIEGGIT_TV ;
hinnit+V:hinºni VALLIT_TV ;
háhttsit+V:háhttsi DULLUT_IV ;
håŋŋlit+V+Err/Orth:hångli BADASS_IV ;
iebnnit+V:iebnni TSIEGGIT_TV ;
inspisierit+V+Area/SE:in^spekt ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN 
jáffit+V:jáfºfi STRÁFFUT_TV ;
jágit+V:jági PLÁNIT_TV ;
jásskut+V:jássku DULLUT_IV ;
jåddnit+V:jåddni VALLIT_TV ;
jåhttåt+V:jåhttå OADDÁT_IV ;
komparierit+V:kompar ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
kånntit+V+Err/Orth:konti BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN BADASS
lignifisierit+V:lignifis ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
linnjit+V:linnji TSIEGGIT_TV ;
loaddnut+V:loaddnu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
luobddát+V:luobddá OADDÁT_IV ;
låddnit+V:låddni VALLIT_TV ;
låhkkåt+V:låhkkå TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
miejllit+V+Err/Orth:maili BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN
musisierit+V+Err/Orth:music BRILJERE_IV ; ! LOAN 
målit+V:måli PLÁNIT_TV ; ! LOAN and not grade 3, in Korhonen
månnit+V:månºni VALLIT_TV ;
nummerierit+V:nummer ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
náhppit+V:náhppi TSIEGGIT_TV ;
nælggát+V:nælggá OADDÁT_IV ;
politihkkit+V:politihkki DULLUT_IV ; ! LOAN
portrettierit+V+Area/SE:porträtt ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN 
regjierit+V:regj ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
riehppit+V:riehppi VALLIT_TV ;
riekknit+V+Err/Orth:riekni PLÁNIT_TV ; !LOAN added because of many typos
rimmit+V:rimºmi DULLUT_IV ;
ráddut+V:ráddu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
råhkkit+V+Err/Orth:rocki BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN BADASS
råvttit+V:råvtti DULLUT_IV ;
sentrifugierit+V+Err/Orth:sentrifugi BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN 
sielggit+V:sielggi TSIEGGIT_TV ;
sivtit+V:sivti SLEDUT_IV ; ! LOAN and not grade 3
sjivnnjut+V:sjivnnju STRÁFFUT_TV ;
sjkávttjit+V:sjkávttji VALLIT_TV ;
sjuggát+V:sjuggá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
skihppát+V:skihppá OADDÁT_IV ;
skáddnit+V:skáddni VALLIT_TV ;
skáddut+V:skáddu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
skájppit+V:skájppi DULLUT_IV ;
sledut+V:sledu SLEDUT_IV ;
sliehpit+V:sliehpi PLÁNIT_TV ;
slábbávvit+V+Err/Lex:slább^ávvi SLEDUT_IV ; ! from frase "slappe av"
slágut+V:slágu SLEDUT_IV ;
slåhttjit+V:slåhttji VALLIT_TV ;
snihttit+V:snihtti TSIEGGIT_TV ;
spihkkit+V:spihkki STRÁFFUT_TV ;
stenografierit+V+Err/Orth:steno^grafi BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN 
stávut+V:stávu PLÁNIT_TV ;
substituierit+V:sub^stitu^ ABBONERE_TV ; ! LOAN
suommit+V:suomºmi VALLIT_TV ;
sáddnut+V:sáddnu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
ságut+V:ságu PLÁNIT_TV ;
sállit+V:sálºli TSIEGGIT_TV ;
sågit+V:sågi PLÁNIT_TV ;
tiekstit+V+Err/Orth:tiekssti BADASS_TV ; ! LOAN
tjállát+V:tjálºlá TJUOLLÁT_TV ;
tjæhttit+V+Err/Orth+Area/SE:chatt BADASS_IV ; ! LOAN 
tjæktut+V:tjæktu DULLUT_IV ;
tsahkkát+V:tsahkká OADDÁT_IV ;
tuhttjit+V:tuhttji TSIEGGIT_TV ; ! LOAN  What does this even mean?
vuohttát+V:vuohttá OADDÁT_IV ;
årrut+V:årºru OADDÁT_IV ;
æjggut+V:æjggu STRÁFFUT_TV ;
massát+V:massá TJUOLLÁT_TV ; !inceptive of masset. Used in Anta Pirak
